Utah statutes.
16-10a-205.   Organization of the corporation.
(1)  After incorporation:
(a)  if initial directors are named in the articles of incorporation, the
initial directors may hold an organizational meeting, at the call of a
majority of the directors, to complete the organization of the corporation by
appointing officers, adopting bylaws, and carrying on any other business
brought before the meeting; or
(b)  if initial directors are not named in the articles of incorporation, then
until directors are elected, the incorporator or incorporators may hold an
organizational meeting at the call of a majority of the incorporators to do
whatever is necessary and proper to complete the organization of the
corporation, including the election of directors and officers and the adoption
and amendment of bylaws.
(2)  Action required or permitted by this chapter to be taken by incorporators
at an organizational meeting may be taken without a meeting if the action
taken is evidenced by one or more written consents describing the action taken
and signed by each incorporator.
(3)  An organizational meeting may be held in or out of this state.
